Washington statutes.
RCW 12.36.080

No dismissal for defective bond—Notice.

No appeal under this chapter shall be dismissed on account of any defect in the bond on appeal, if, within ten days of notice to appellant of such defect, the appellant executes and files in the court currently possessed of the cause such bond as should have been executed at the time of taking the appeal, and pay all costs that may have accrued by reason of such defect.

[ 1998 c 52 s 4; 1997 c 352 s 12; 1929 c 58 s 7; RRS s 1917. Prior: Code 1881 s 1867; 1873 p 369 s 165; 1854 p 253 s 169.]